Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201477-3506.02
County assessor; duties.

After county board of equalization action pursuant to sections 77-1502
to 77-1504.01 and on or before September 1 each year, the county assessor
shall certify to the Department of Revenue the average assessed value of single-family
residential property in the county for the current year for purposes of sections 77-3507, 77-3508, and 77-3509.

The county assessor shall determine the current average assessed value
of single-family residential property from all real property records containing
dwellings, mobile homes, and duplexes all of which are designed for occupancy
as single-family residential property and any associated land not to exceed
one acre.

The county assessor shall also report to the Department of Revenue the
computed exempt amounts pursuant to section 77-3501.01.

Laws 1994, LB 902, § 32;

Laws 1995, LB 499, § 1;

Laws 2004, LB 973, § 43;

Laws 2014, LB1087, § 3.